Massachusetts, session 194th, H5528.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation - Highway Division shall establish a sick leave bank for Edward
Gillen an employee of the Highway Division of the Department of Transportation. Any
employee of the Department may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation
days to the sick leave bank for use by Edward Gillen. If Edward Gillen terminates employment
with the Department or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick
leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not
be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of
the sick leave bank as determined by the Department.
of 1